California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) If approved by the California Lawyers Association, California ChangeLawyers, and Cal Bar Affinity, and provided the California Lawyers Association complies with the requirement in subdivision (e), all revenue received from the noninsurance affinity programs and the insurance affinity programs, less the administrative costs of the State Bar and Cal Bar Affinity in operating the programs, up to a maximum of 12 percent of the revenue received, and the taxes incurred by Cal Bar Affinity in operating the programs, shall be distributed as follows on and after January 1, 2020:

(1) The first one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of revenue received in 2020 and the first one hundred
 fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) received in 2021 shall go to the California Commission on Access to Justice, payable as follows:

(A) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be paid on or before March 31, 2020, and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be paid on or before June 30, 2020.

(B) Thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500) shall be paid on or before March 31, 2021, thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500) shall be paid on or before June 30, 2021, thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500) shall be paid on or before September 30, 2021, and thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500) shall be paid on or before December 31, 2021.

(2) Any additional revenue shall be distributed as follows:

(A) One-third of the remaining revenue shall go to California ChangeLawyers.

(B) One-third of the remaining revenue shall go to the California Lawyers Association or an affiliated 501(c)(3) organization to support their respective diversity, equity and inclusion, access to justice, and civic engagement efforts.

(C) One-third of the remaining revenue shall go to California ChangeLawyers, which shall distribute that revenue to qualified legal services projects and support centers in accordance with the formula provided in Section 6216. However, in any year, a qualified legal services project or support center, as defined in Section 6213, may elect in writing to direct their allocation for that year to California ChangeLawyers for fellowships for law students and law graduates at qualified legal services projects and support centers. California ChangeLawyers shall
 utilize a competitive grant application process for determining grant awards. In awarding these statewide grants, preference shall be given to qualified legal services projects or support centers that serve rural or underserved communities and that serve clients regardless of immigration or citizenship status. The minimum grant amount shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) Given the public protection mission of the State Bar, the Legislature finds that it would be inappropriate for the State Bar to administer the program on a long-term basis. Therefore, should the program continue to operate after December 31, 2018, it is the intent of the Legislature that the program be administered by an entity other than the State Bar.

(e) If the California Lawyers Association elects to accept any share of the affinity funds revenue under this section, the California Lawyers Association
 shall not create or operate, or participate in the creation or operation, or otherwise solicit its members, or arrange to have its members solicited, for any affinity or royalty program involving similar insurance or noninsurance products or services with a percentage or share of costs being distributed to the California Lawyers Association, other than as provided in this section. If the California Lawyers Association creates or operates, or participates in the creation or operation, or otherwise solicits its members, or arranges to have its members solicited for any affinity or royalty program involving the sale of insurance or noninsurance products or services with a percentage or share of costs being distributed to the California Lawyers Association, all funds that would have been provided to the California Lawyers Association from affinity or royalty programs that transferred from the State Bar or are similar to programs that transferred from the State Bar shall be provided to California ChangeLawyers,
 which shall distribute 50 percent of that revenue to support the programs of California ChangeLawyers and 50 percent of that revenue to qualified legal services projects and support centers as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of this section.

(f) The California Lawyers Association or the affiliated 501(c)(3) organization shall submit an annual report to the Legislature by January 31 of each year detailing their use of funds, as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and a statement of compliance with subdivision (e). The report shall cover the prior calendar year from January through December, except for the first report due on January 31, 2026, which shall cover the prior three calendar years of 2023, 2024, and 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 10.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6142.

Upon the payment of the annual license fees, including any costs imposed pursuant to Section 6140.7, and penalties imposed pursuant to Section 6143, each licensee shall receive a certificate issued under the direction of the board evidencing the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 109.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6143.

Any licensee, active or inactive, failing to pay any fees, penalties, or costs after they become due, and after two months written notice of his or her delinquency, shall have his or her license suspended.

The licensee may be reinstated upon the payment of accrued fees or costs and such penalties as may be imposed by the board, not exceeding double the amount of delinquent fees, penalties, or costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 110.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6143.5.

Any licensee, active or inactive, failing to pay any child support after it becomes due shall be subject to Section 17520 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 111.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6144.

(a) All fees shall be paid into the treasury of the State Bar, and, when so paid, shall become part of its funds.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and consistent with the reimbursement requirement under Section 6031.5, all fees paid pursuant to Section 6140.02 shall be paid by the State Bar to the Association, and, when paid, shall become part of the funds of the Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 34.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6144.1.

(a) The net proceeds from the sale of real property, after payment of obligations and encumbrances and reasonable costs of acquiring and relocating its facilities, if any, shall be held by the State Bar without expenditure or commitment for any purpose until approved by the Legislature by statute. The net proceeds from the lease of real property, after payment of obligations and encumbrances and reasonable costs of acquiring and relocating its facilities, if any, shall be used by the State Bar for the protection of the public.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the net proceeds from the sale of the State Bar’s San Francisco office building, after payment of obligations and encumbrances
 and the minimally reasonable costs of acquiring and relocating its facilities, if any, may be utilized by the State Bar to cover employee salaries, and to cover operational costs associated with the State Bar’s discipline system and administration of the biannual admissions exam.

(c) All proceeds expended not consistent with subdivision (b) shall be held by the State Bar without expenditure or commitment for any purpose until approved by the Legislature by statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 29.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6144.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to confirm, validate, and declare effective the annual license fees, and all augmentations, including, but not limited to, those made under Sections 6140.3 and 6140.6, fixed and collected by the board for 1990, and all other acts arising from and related thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 112.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6145.

(a) The board shall engage the services of an independent national or regional public accounting firm with at least five years of experience in governmental auditing for an audit of its financial statement for each fiscal year. The financial statement shall be promptly certified under oath by the chief financial officer of the State Bar, and a copy of the audit and financial statement shall be submitted annually, on or before May 31, to the board, to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

The audit also shall examine the receipts and expenditures of the State Bar to ensure that the funds collected on behalf of the Conference of Delegates of California Bar
 Associations as the independent successor entity to the former Conference of Delegates of the State Bar are conveyed to that entity, that the State Bar has been paid or reimbursed for the full cost of any administrative and support services provided to the successor entity, including the collection of fees or donations on its behalf, and that no mandatory fees are being used to fund the activities of the successor entity.

In selecting the accounting firm, the board shall consider the value of continuity, along with the risk that continued long-term engagements of an accounting firm may affect the independence of that firm.

(b) The board shall contract with the California State Auditor’s Office to conduct a performance audit of the State Bar’s operations from July 1, 2000, to December 31, 2000,
 inclusive. A copy of the performance audit shall be submitted by May 1, 2001, to the board, to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

Every two years thereafter, the board shall contract with the California State Auditor’s Office to conduct a performance audit of the State Bar’s operations for the respective fiscal year, commencing with January 1, 2002, to December 31, 2002, inclusive. A copy of the performance audit shall be submitted within 120 days of the close of the fiscal year for which the audit was performed to the board, to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

For the purposes of this subdivision, the California State Auditor’s Office may contract with a third party to conduct the performance
 audit. This subdivision is not intended to reduce the number of audits the California State Auditor’s Office may otherwise be able to conduct.

(c) (1) For the 2023 audit required pursuant to subdivision (b), the California State Auditor’s Office shall conduct a performance audit of the State Bar as set forth in this subdivision. The State Bar shall provide technical assistance, data, or information as requested by the California State Auditor. It is the intent of the Legislature that this audit may be reviewed in conjunction with the legislation that authorizes the State Bar’s licensing fee in 2023.

(2) The audit shall evaluate each program or division of the State Bar receiving support from the annual State Bar licensing fees and other fees required of active and
 inactive licensees.

(3) The audit shall, at minimum, include all of the following for each program or division described by paragraph (2):

(A) An assessment of how much fee revenue, staff, and resources are currently budgeted and subsequently expended to
 perform existing tasks and responsibilities.

(B) An assessment of whether the State Bar has appropriate program performance measures in place and how these measures are used for budgeting purposes.

(C) An assessment of the usage of any real property sold by the State Bar.

(D) A review of the State Bar’s cost allocation plan used to allocate administrative costs.

(E) A review of any proposals for additional funding or resources requested by the State Bar to determine whether these proposals are necessary to meet the State Bar’s public protection function, as well as the accuracy of identified associated funding needs, after reviewing how
 existing resources are used.

(F) A calculation of how much fee revenue would be needed from each State Bar active and inactive licensee to fully offset State Bar costs to perform existing tasks and responsibilities and to support additional proposed expenditures determined to be necessary to meet the State Bar’s public protection function. This calculation shall take into account any proposed business process reengineering, reallocations, or efficiencies identified by the California State Auditor.

(4) The audit shall include an evaluation of how the State Bar administers discipline cases that require an outside investigator or prosecutor and how that process can be improved, including the cost-effectiveness and timeliness of such investigations and prosecutions.

(5) The audit required by this subdivision shall be submitted by April 15, 2023, to the board of trustees, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

(6) The State Bar shall use existing resources to reimburse the California State Auditor’s Office for the costs of conducting the audit required by this subdivision.

(d) (1) The California State Auditor shall conduct an audit of the February 2025 bar exam to evaluate the administration of the February 2025 bar exam and how the problems with the exam occurred.

(2) The audit required by this subdivision shall do all of the following:

(A) Evaluate the bidding and contracting process that the State Bar engaged in that led to awarding the contract to Proctor U, Inc., doing business as Meazure Learning, as well as the final terms of the contract, and determine the following:

(i) Whether the process was conducted according to existing laws, regulations, and policies.

(ii) What evaluation criteria were used to determine whether Meazure Learning had experience with, and was capable of, conducting an examination similar to the State Bar examination.

(iii) Whether the State Bar appropriately evaluated and authorized any changes, including cost changes, to the executed contract.

(iv) Whether there were appropriate protections from, and evaluations of, any potential conflicts of interest that may have existed between relevant staff at the State Bar and Meazure Learning.

(B) Evaluate the bidding and contracting process that the State Bar engaged in that led to awarding the contract to Kaplan, Inc. for administration of the State Bar examination multiple choice questions, as well as the final terms of the contract for those services, and determine all of the following:

(i) Whether the processes were conducted according to existing laws, regulations, and policies.

(ii) What evaluation criteria was used to determine whether Kaplan,
 Inc. had experience with, and was capable of, creating relevant and appropriate questions similar to existing comparable entities like the National Conference of Bar Examiners.

(iii) Whether the terms of the contract allowed for oversight and monitoring of the question development process, and whether the State Bar appropriately utilized its oversight and monitoring to ensure that sufficient processes were engaged in to develop questions, ensure accuracy, and ensure fairness in the question development.

(iv) Why Kaplan, Inc. provided 100 multiple choice questions for the February 2025 bar exam, instead of 200.

(C) Evaluate the process that the
 State Bar engaged in leading up to the administration of the February 2025 State Bar examination to ensure that the examination was conducted in a way that allowed participants to engage fairly in the examination process, and determine all of the following:

(i) When and how the State Bar became aware of any potential problems with the administration of the examination, including
 limits or problems with examination locations, and how those potential problems were addressed.

(ii) How the process for remote examination employed for the February 2025 State Bar examination differed from the processes used for remote examination during the COVID-19 pandemic, and the reasons for those differences.

(iii) The process and reasoning for determining that a makeup examination date should be offered, and the timeline for making that determination.

(iv) The process for determining what specific equipment would be permitted for test-takers, such as white boards, and the reasoning and processes utilized to make any changes to those requirements leading up to the examination date.

(D) Evaluate the events that led the State Bar to use artificial intelligence to create multiple choice questions for use on the February 2025 State Bar examination, including all of the following:

(i) When the decision was made.

(ii) Who or what department made the decision.

(iii) The rationale for making the decision.

(iv) When executive leadership at the State Bar knew that artificial intelligence was used to create questions for the February 2025 State Bar examination.

(v) What evaluation criteria were used to ensure that the questions were correct and appropriate for use on the February 2025 State Bar examination.

(vi) What deficiencies in oversight by executive leadership at the Office of Admissions existed, if any, and how have any such deficiencies been remedied.

(E) (i) Itemize the State Bar costs arising from administration of the February 2025 State Bar examination, including, but not limited to, costs arising from existing contracts, legal representation, remedies provided to takers of the February 2025 State Bar examination, and any other associated costs. The costs itemized in this clause should include money already spent, money the State Bar is legally obligated to spend going forward, and other anticipated costs.

(ii) Identify how much money the State Bar claimed it would save by using the February 2025 State Bar examination format and compare that amount to the total of the costs itemized
 pursuant to clause (i).

(3) The audit required by this subdivision shall be submitted as soon as possible to the board of trustees, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 8544.5 of the Government Code or any other law, the costs of conducting the audit required by this subdivision shall not be paid from the State Audit Fund. The State Bar shall use existing resources to provide the California State Auditor with the funding necessary to cover the costs of the audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   (SB 47)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6145.1.

(a) (1) The California State Bar shall prepare a report providing written justification for how it would use revenue generated by an increase in the mandatory annual license fee authorized by Section 6140 for active licensees and Section 6141 for inactive licensees. It is the intent of the Legislature to review this report in conjunction with legislation authorizing the State Bar’s licensing fee in 2025.

(2) This report shall include the State Bar’s calculation of the necessary fee increase to maintain its existing operations and service levels and provide clear justification for any differences from the amounts calculated by the California State Auditor in its April 2023 audit.

(3) This report shall also include the State Bar’s assessment of all programs and activities that require additional support from the annual license fee. For each program and activity, this assessment shall include all of the following:

(A) A detailed description of the program and activity.

(B) The projected, budgeted, and actual expenditures in 2023, 2024, and 2025 assuming no increase in the annual fee.

(C) The estimated deficit and the reason for the deficit.

(D) What aspects of the programs or activities would not be achievable if a fee increase was not provided.

(E) Complete, actual data for 2023.

(4) This report shall also include information on how the State Bar proposes to use any potential additional funding resulting from any potential increase in the mandatory annual license fee. Specifically, for every twenty-five-dollar ($25) incremental increase in the mandatory annual license fee for active licensees and corresponding six dollars and twenty-five-cent ($6.25) incremental increase in the mandatory annual license fee for inactive licenses the State Bar shall report, at a minimum, the following:

(A) The total amount of revenue estimated to be generated from the incremental increase.

(B) A description of which State Bar programs and activities would be funded by the revenue generated from the incremental increase and any recent major operational or procedural changes implemented in those programs and
 activities.

(C) In cases where a program or activity identified pursuant to paragraph (3) is proposed to receive funding, detailed justification for the amount of funding proposed to be used to support the program or activity, how that amount was calculated along with any key assumptions made, what outcomes are expected to be achieved, and what, if any, deficit would remain for the activity or program along with what aspects of the activity or program would be unachievable due to the deficit. This justification shall also clearly specify the extent to which the funding is or will be used to complete business process reengineering, improve processes, or improve efficiencies.

(5) The information provided pursuant to paragraph (4) shall reflect the State Bar’s actual planned use of the funding for each potential incremental increase and the State Bar shall not assume that it may
 redirect the funding for other purposes should an increase in the annual fee be approved.

(6) This report shall be submitted no later than April 1, 2024, to the board of trustees, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

(b) In addition to the report required by subdivision (a), the State Bar shall provide a progress report on the Office of Chief Trial Counsel’s case processing standards, which shall be submitted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a). This progress report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The status of changes made to case disciplinary processes and an assessment of how those changes are impacting case processing times.

(2) A discussion of how concerns
 related to operational efficiency raised by the California State Auditor and the Legislative Analyst’s Office have been addressed or are planned to be addressed.

(3) An assessment of how recent case processing times compare to the State Bar’s proposed average case processing standards. This assessment shall also include data on the timeliness of the completion of the hearing stage in order to provide a comprehensive picture of case processing times.

(4) An assessment of how recent case processing times compare to the State Bar’s proposed backlog standards, as well as the proposed standards calculated using pending rather than closed workload as discussed by the Legislative Analyst’s January 2023 report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 31.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Fee Agreements [6146. - 6149.5.]

6146.

(a) An attorney shall not contract for or collect a contingency fee for representing any person seeking damages in connection with an action for injury or damage against a health care provider based upon such person’s alleged professional negligence in excess of the following limits:

(1) Twenty-five percent of the dollar amount recovered if the recovery is pursuant to settlement agreement and release of all claims executed by all parties thereto prior to a civil complaint or demand for arbitration being filed.

(2) Thirty-three percent of the dollar amount recovered if the recovery is pursuant to settlement, arbitration, or judgment after a civil complaint or demand for arbitration is filed.

(3) If an action is tried in a civil court or arbitrated, the attorney representing the plaintiff or claimant may file a motion with the court or arbitrator for a contingency fee in excess of the
 percentage stated in paragraph (2), which motion shall be filed and served on all parties to the action and decided in the court’s discretion based on evidence establishing good cause for the higher contingency fee.

The limitations shall apply regardless of whether the recovery is by settlement, arbitration, or judgment, or whether the person for whom the recovery is made is a responsible adult, an infant, or a person of unsound mind.

(b) If periodic payments are awarded to the plaintiff pursuant to Section 667.7 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court shall place a total value on these payments based upon the projected life expectancy of the plaintiff and include this amount in computing the total award from which attorney’s fees are calculated under this section.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Recovered” means the net sum recovered after deducting any disbursements or costs incurred in connection with prosecution or settlement of the claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and the attorney’s office-overhead costs or charges are not deductible disbursements or costs for such purpose.

(2) “Health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code; and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code. “Health care provider” includes the legal representatives of a health care provider.

(3) “Professional negligence” is a negligent act or omission to act by a health care provider in the rendering of professional services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal injury or wrongful death, provided that the services are within the scope of services for which the provider is licensed and which are not within any restriction imposed by the licensing agency or licensed hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   (AB 35)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6147.

(a) An attorney who contracts to represent a client on a contingency fee basis shall, at the time the contract is entered into, provide a duplicate copy of the contract, signed by both the attorney and the client, or the client’s guardian or representative, to the plaintiff, or to the client’s guardian or representative. The contract shall be in writing and shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A statement of the contingency fee rate that the client and attorney have agreed upon.

(2) A statement as to how disbursements and costs incurred in connection with the prosecution or settlement of the claim will affect the contingency fee and the client’s recovery.

(3) A statement as to what extent, if any, the client could be required to pay any compensation to the attorney for related matters that arise out of their relationship not covered by their contingency fee contract. This may include any amounts collected for the plaintiff by the attorney.

(4) Unless the claim is subject to the provisions of Section 6146, a statement that the fee is not set by law but is negotiable between attorney and client.

(5) If the claim is subject to the provisions of Section 6146, a statement that the rates set forth in that section are the maximum limits for the contingency fee agreement, and that the attorney and client may negotiate a lower rate.

(b) Failure to comply with any provision of this section renders the agreement voidable at the option of the plaintiff, and the attorney shall thereupon be entitled to collect a reasonable fee.

(c) This section shall not apply to contingency fee contracts for the recovery of workers’ compensation benefits.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 479, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1104, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative January 1, 2000, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6147.5.

(a) Sections 6147 and 6148 shall not apply to contingency fee contracts for the recovery of claims between merchants as defined in Section 2104 of the Commercial Code, arising from the sale or lease of goods or services rendered, or money loaned for use, in the conduct of a business or profession if the merchant contracting for legal services employs 10 or more individuals.

(b) (1) In the instances in which no written contract for legal services exists as permitted by subdivision (a), an attorney shall not contract for or collect a contingency fee in excess of the following limits:

(A) Twenty percent of the first three hundred dollars ($300) collected.

(B) Eighteen percent of the next one thousand seven hundred dollars ($1,700) collected.

(C) Thirteen percent of sums collected in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) However, the following minimum charges may be charged and collected:

(A) Twenty-five dollars ($25) in collections of seventy-five dollars ($75) to one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(B) Thirty-three and one-third percent of collections less than seventy-five dollars ($75).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6148.

(a) In any case not coming within Section 6147 in which it is reasonably foreseeable that total expense to a client, including attorney fees, will exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), the contract for services in the case shall be in writing. At the time the contract is entered into, the attorney shall provide a duplicate copy of the contract signed by both the attorney and the client, or the client’s guardian or representative, to the client or to the client’s guardian or representative. The written contract shall contain all of the following:

(1) Any basis of compensation including, but not limited to, hourly rates, statutory fees or flat fees, and other standard rates, fees, and charges applicable to the case.

(2) The general nature of the legal services to be provided to the client.

(3) The respective responsibilities of the attorney and the client as to the performance of the contract.

(b) All bills rendered by an attorney to a client shall clearly state the basis thereof. Bills for the fee portion of the bill shall include the amount, rate, basis for calculation, or other method of determination of the attorney’s fees and costs. Bills for the cost and expense portion of the bill shall clearly identify the costs and expenses incurred and the amount of the costs and expenses. Upon request by the client, the attorney shall provide a bill to the client no later than 10 days following the request unless the attorney has provided a bill to the client within 31 days prior to the request, in which case the attorney may provide a bill to the client no later than 31 days following the date the most recent bill was provided. The client is entitled to make similar requests at intervals of no less than 30 days following the initial request. In providing responses to client requests for billing information, the attorney may use billing data that is currently effective on the date of the request, or, if any fees or costs to that date cannot be accurately determined, they shall be described and estimated.

(c) Failure to comply with any provision of this section renders the agreement voidable at the option of the client, and the attorney shall, upon the agreement being voided, be entitled to collect a reasonable fee.

(d) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Services rendered in an emergency to avoid foreseeable prejudice to the rights or interests of the client or where a writing is otherwise impractical.

(2) An arrangement as to the fee implied by the fact that the attorney’s services are of the same general kind as previously rendered to and paid for by the client.

(3) If the client knowingly states in writing, after full disclosure of this section, that a writing concerning fees is not required.

(4) If the client is a corporation.

(e) This section applies prospectively only to fee agreements following its operative date.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 479, Sec. 5) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1104, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative January 1, 2000, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6149.

A written fee contract shall be deemed to be a confidential communication within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 6068 and of Section 952 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 475, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6149.5.

(a) Upon the payment of one hundred dollars ($100) or more in settlement of any third-party liability claim the insurer shall provide written notice to the claimant if both of the following apply:

(1) The claimant is a natural person.

(2) The payment is delivered to the claimant’s lawyer or other representative by draft, check, or otherwise.

(b) For purposes of this section, “written notice” includes providing to the claimant a copy of the cover letter sent to the claimant’s attorney or other representative that accompanied the settlement payment.

(c) This section shall not create any cause of action for any person against the insurer based upon the insurer’s failure to provide the notice to a claimant required by this section. This section shall not create a defense for any party to any cause of action based upon the insurer’s failure to provide this notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 479, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Unlawful Solicitation [6150. - 6156.5.]

6150.

This article is a part of Chapter 4 of this division of the Business and Professions Code, but the phrase “this chapter” as used in Chapter 4 does not apply to the provisions of this article unless expressly made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6151.

As used in this article:

(a) A runner or capper is any person, firm, association or corporation acting for consideration in any manner or in any capacity as an agent for an attorney at law or law firm, whether the attorney or any member of the law firm is admitted in California or any other jurisdiction, in the solicitation or procurement of business for the attorney at law or law firm as provided in this article. 

(b) An agent is one who represents another in dealings with one or more third persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

6152.

(a) It is unlawful for:

(1) Any person, in an individual capacity or in a capacity as a public or private employee, or for any firm, corporation, partnership or association to act as a runner or capper for any attorneys or to solicit any business for any attorneys in and about the state prisons, county jails, city jails, city prisons, or other places of detention of persons, city receiving hospitals, city and county receiving hospitals, county hospitals, superior courts, or in any public institution or in any public place or upon any public street or highway or in and about private hospitals, sanitariums or in and about any private institution or upon private property of any character whatsoever.

(2) Any person to solicit another person to commit or join in the commission of a violation of subdivision (a).

(b) A general release from a liability claim obtained from any person during the period of the first physical confinement, whether as an inpatient or outpatient, in a clinic or health facility, as defined in Sections 1203 and 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, as a result of the injury alleged to have given rise to the claim and primarily for treatment of the injury, is presumed fraudulent if the release is executed within 15 days after the commencement of confinement or prior to release from confinement, whichever occurs first.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the recommendation of professional employment where that recommendation is not prohibited by the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar of California.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that a public defender or assigned counsel may not make known his or her services as a criminal defense attorney to persons unable to afford legal counsel whether those persons are in custody or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6153.

(a) A person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation violating subdivision (a) of Section 6152 is punishable, upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. Upon a second or subsequent conviction, a person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or by a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) A
 person employed either as an officer, director, trustee, clerk, servant or agent of this state or of any county or other municipal corporation or subdivision thereof, who is found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this article, shall forfeit the right to their office and employment in addition to any other penalty provided in this article.

(c) Any person may bring a civil action for a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 6152 for the following remedies:

(1) Statutory damages of a minimum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) up to a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation, or three times the amount of actual damages, whichever is larger. The amount of statutory damages in this subdivision shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) Attorney’s fees.

(3) Injunctive or declaratory relief.

(4) Any other relief the court deems proper.

(d) In assessing the amount of statutory damages, the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by the case, including, but not limited to, the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.
